New York, session 2025-2026, A6212.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (a) of section 5519 of the civil practice law 2 and rules is amended by adding a new closing paragraph to read as 3 follows: 4 Notwithstanding the provisions of this subdivision, the provisions of 5 this subdivision shall not apply to the maintenance, spousal support or 6 child support provisions, as defined in article thirteen of the domestic 7 relations law and in articles four, five and five-B of the family court 8 act, of a judgment, order or decree. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to all 10 matrimonial actions whenever commenced; except that, where enforcement 11 of a judgment, order or decree has been stayed pursuant to subdivision 12 (a) of section 5519 of the civil practice law and rules prior to such 13 effective date, such stay shall continue in effect in accordance with 14 law then in effect. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09336-01-5